Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7639.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and short title.
The general assembly finds and declares the following:
(1) Direct-to-consumer genetic testing services are largely unregulated and could expose
personal and genetic information, and potentially create unintended security consequences and
increased risk.
(2) There is growing concern in the scientific community that outside parties are exploiting
the use of genetic data for questionable purposes, including mass surveillance and the ability to
track individuals without their authorization.
(3) Genomic data is highly distinguishable. There is a confirmation that a sequence of 30
to 80 single nucleotide polymorphisms could uniquely identify an individual. Genomic data is also
very stable. It undergoes little change over the lifetime of an individual and thus has a long-lived
value, as opposed to other biometric data such as blood tests, which have expiration dates.
(4) The potential information hidden within genomic data is cause for significant concern.
As our knowledge in genomics evolves, so will our view on the sensitivity of genomic data.
SECTION 2. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 63
GENETIC INFORMATION PRIVACY ACT

6-63-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the "Genetic Information Privacy Act."
6-63-2. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) “Affirmative authorization” means an action that demonstrates an intentional decision
by the consumer.
(2) “Biological sample” means any material part of a human subject, discharge therefrom,
or derivative thereof, such as tissue, blood, urine, or saliva, known to contain deoxyribonucleic acid
(DNA).
(3) “Consumer” means a natural person who is a Rhode Island resident.
(4) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with the substantial
effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision making, or choice.
(5) “Direct-to-consumer genetic testing company” means an entity that does any of the
following:
(i) Sells, markets, interprets, or otherwise offers consumer-initiated genetic testing
products or services directly to consumers.
(ii) Analyzes genetic data obtained from a consumer, except to the extent that the analysis
is performed by a person licensed in the healing arts for diagnosis or treatment of a medical
condition.
(iii) Collects, uses, maintains, or discloses genetic data collected or derived from a direct-
to-consumer genetic testing product or service, or is directly provided by a consumer.
(6) “Express consent” means a consumer’s affirmative authorization to grant permission in
response to a clear, meaningful, and prominent notice regarding the collection, use, maintenance,
or disclosure of genetic data for a specific purpose. The nature of the data collection, use,
maintenance, or disclosure shall be conveyed in clear and prominent terms in such a manner that
an ordinary consumer would notice and understand it. Express consent cannot be inferred from
inaction. Agreement obtained through use of dark patterns does not constitute consent.
(7)(i) “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that results from the analysis
of a biological sample from a consumer, or from another element enabling equivalent information
to be obtained, and concerns genetic material. Genetic material includes, but is not limited to,
deoxyribonucleic acids (DNA), ribonucleic acids (RNA), genes, chromosomes, alleles, genomes,
alterations or modifications to DNA or RNA, single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs),
uninterpreted data that results from the analysis of the biological sample, and any information
extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.
LC005027 - Page 2 of 10

(ii) “Genetic data” does not include deidentified data. For purposes of this subsection,
“deidentified data” means data that cannot be used to infer information about, or otherwise be
linked to, a particular individual; provided that, the business that possesses the information does all
of the following:
(A) Takes reasonable measures to ensure that the information cannot be associated with a
consumer or household;
(B) Publicly commits to maintain and use the information only in deidentified form and
not to attempt to reidentify the information, except that the business may attempt to reidentify the
information solely for the purpose of determining whether its deidentification processes satisfy the
requirements of this subsection; provided that, the business does not use or disclose any information
reidentified in this process and destroys the reidentified information upon completion of that
assessment; and
(C) Contractually obligates any recipients of the information to take reasonable measures
to ensure that the information cannot be associated with a consumer or household and to commit
to maintaining and using the information only in deidentified form and not to reidentify the
information;
(iii) “Genetic data” does not include data or a biological sample to the extent that data or a
biological sample is collected, used, maintained, and disclosed exclusively for scientific research
conducted by an investigator with an institution that holds an assurance with the United States
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to 45 CFR Part 46 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, in compliance with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations for the
protection of human subjects in research including, but not limited to, the Common Rule pursuant
to 45 CFR Part 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations, United States Food and Drug Administration
regulations pursuant to 21 CFR Parts 50 and 56 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and the federal
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Rights Act (20 U.S.C. §. 1232g).
(8) “Genetic testing” means any laboratory test of a biological sample from a consumer for
the purpose of determining information concerning genetic material contained within the biological
sample, or any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred therefrom.
(9) “Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, business, business
trust, or legal representative of an organization.
(10) “Service provider” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, association, or other legal entity that is organized or operated for the profit or financial
benefit of its shareholders or other owners, that is involved in the collection, transportation, and
analysis of the consumer’s biological sample or extracted genetic material on behalf of the direct-
LC005027 - Page 3 of 10

to-consumer genetic testing company, or on behalf of any other company that collects, uses,
maintains, or discloses genetic data collected or derived from a direct-to-consumer genetic testing
product or service, or is directly provided by a consumer, or the delivery of the results of the
analysis of the biological sample or genetic material. The contract between the company and the
service provider shall prohibit the service provider from retaining, using, or disclosing the
biological sample, extracted genetic material, genetic data, or any information regarding the
identity of the consumer, including whether that consumer has solicited or received genetic testing,
as applicable, for any purpose other than for the specific purpose of performing the services
specified in the contract for the business, including both of the following:
(i) A provision prohibiting the service provider from retaining, using, or disclosing the
biological sample, extracted genetic material, genetic data, or any information regarding the
identity of the consumer, including whether that consumer has solicited or received genetic testing,
as applicable, for a commercial purpose other than providing the services specified in the contract
with the business; and
(ii) A provision prohibiting the service provider from associating or combining the
biological sample, extracted genetic material, genetic data, or any information regarding the
identity of the consumer, including whether that consumer has solicited or received genetic testing,
as applicable, with information the service provider has received from or on behalf of another
person or persons, or has collected from its own interaction with consumers or as required by law.
6-63-3. Privacy of genetic data.
(a) To safeguard the privacy, confidentiality, security, and integrity of a consumer’s genetic
data, a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall do both of the following:
(1) Provide clear and complete information regarding the company’s policies and
procedures for the collection, use, maintenance, and disclosure, as applicable, of genetic data by
making available to a consumer all of the following:
(i) A summary of its privacy practices, written in plain language, that includes information
about the company’s collection, use, maintenance, and disclosure, as applicable, of genetic data;
(ii) A prominent and easily accessible privacy notice that includes, at a minimum, complete
information about the company’s data collection, consent, use, access, disclosure, maintenance,
transfer, security, and retention and deletion practices, and information that clearly describes how
to file a complaint alleging a violation of this chapter; and
(iii) A notice that the consumer’s deidentified genetic or phenotypic information may be
shared with or disclosed to third parties for research purposes in accordance with 45 CFR Part 46
of the Code of Federal Regulations.
LC005027 - Page 4 of 10

(2) Obtain a consumer’s express consent for collection, use, and disclosure of the
consumer’s genetic data, including, at a minimum, separate and express consent for each of the
following:
(i) The use of the genetic data collected through the genetic testing product or service
offered to the consumer, including who has access to genetic data, and how genetic data may be
shared, and the specific purposes for which it will be collected, used, and disclosed;
(ii) The storage of a consumer’s biological sample after the initial testing requested by the
consumer has been fulfilled;
(iii) Each use of genetic data or the biological sample beyond the primary purpose of the
genetic testing or service and inherent contextual uses;
(iv) Each transfer or disclosure of the consumer’s genetic data or biological sample to a
third party other than to a service provider, including the name of the third party to which the
consumer’s genetic data or biological sample will be transferred or disclosed; and
(v)(A) The marketing or facilitation of marketing to a consumer based on the consumer’s
genetic data or the marketing or facilitation of marketing by a third party based upon the consumer
having ordered, purchased, received, or used a genetic testing product or service;
(B) This subsection does not require a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company to
obtain a consumer’s express consent to market to the consumer on the company’s own website or
mobile application based upon the consumer having ordered, purchased, received, or used a genetic
testing product or service from that company if the content of the advertisement does not depend
upon any information specific to that consumer, except for the product or service that the consumer
ordered, purchased, received, or used, and the placement of the advertisement is not intended to
result in disparate exposure to advertising content. Nothing in this subsection alters, limits, or
negates the requirements of any other antidiscrimination law or targeted advertising law;
(C) Any advertisement of a third-party product or service presented to a consumer shall be
prominently labeled as advertising content and be accompanied by the name of any third party that
has contributed to the placement of the advertising. If applicable, the advertisement also shall
clearly indicate that the advertised product or service, and any associated claims, have not been
vetted or endorsed by the direct-to-consumer genetic testing company; and
(D) For the purpose of this section, “third party” does not include a public or private
nonprofit postsecondary educational institution to the extent that the consumer’s genetic data or
biological sample is disclosed to a public or private nonprofit postsecondary educational institution
for the purpose of scientific research or educational activities as described in § 6-63-6. A company
that is subject to the requirements described in this section shall provide effective mechanisms,
LC005027 - Page 5 of 10

without any unnecessary steps, for a consumer to revoke their consent after it is given, at least one
of which utilizes the primary medium through which the company communicates with consumers.
(b) If a consumer revokes the consent that they provided pursuant to this section, the
company shall honor the consumer’s consent revocation as soon as practicable, but not later than
thirty (30) days after the individual revokes consent, in accordance with both of the following:
(1) Revocation of consent under this section shall comply with 45 CFR Part 46 of the Code
of Federal Regulations; and
(2) The company shall destroy a consumer’s biological sample within thirty (30) days of
receipt of revocation of consent to store the sample.
(c) The direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall do both of the following:
(1) Implement and maintain reasonable security procedures and practices to protect a
consumer’s genetic data against unauthorized access, destruction, use, modification, or disclosure;
and
(2) Develop procedures and practices to enable a consumer to easily do any of the
following;
(i) Access the consumer’s genetic data;
(ii) Delete the consumer’s account and genetic data, except for genetic data that is required
to be retained by the company to comply with applicable legal and regulatory requirements; or
(iii) Have the consumer’s biological sample destroyed.
(d) A person or public entity shall not discriminate against a consumer because the
consumer exercised any of the consumer’s rights under this chapter by doing any of the following
including, but not limited to:
(1) Denying goods, services, or benefits to the customer;
(2) Charging different prices or rates for goods or services, including through the use of
discounts or other incentives or imposing penalties;
(3) Providing a different level or quality of goods, services, or benefits to the consumer;
(4) Suggesting that the consumer will receive a different price or rate for goods, services,
or benefits, or a different level or quality of goods, services, or benefits; or
(5) Considering the consumer’s exercise of rights under this chapter as a basis for suspicion
of criminal wrongdoing or unlawful conduct.
(e)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, and except as provided in
subsection (e)(2) of this section, a direct-to-consumer genetic testing company shall not disclose a
consumer’s genetic data to any entity that is responsible for administering or making decisions
regarding health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance, disability insurance, or
LC005027 - Page 6 of 10

employment or to any entity that provides advice to an entity that is responsible for performing
those functions;
(2) A direct-to-consumer genetic testing company may disclose a consumer’s genetic data
or biological sample to an entity described in subsection (e)(1) of this section if all of the following
are true:
(i) The entity is not primarily engaged in administering health insurance, life insurance,
long-term care insurance, disability insurance, or employment;
(ii) The consumer’s genetic data or biological sample is not disclosed to the entity in that
entity’s capacity as a party that is responsible for administering, advising, or making decisions
regarding health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance, disability insurance, or
employment; and
(iii) Any agent or division of the entity that is involved in administering, advising, or
making decisions regarding health insurance, life insurance, long-term care insurance, disability
insurance, or employment is prohibited from accessing the consumer’s genetic data or biological
sample.
6-63-4. Penalties.
(a) Any person who negligently violates this chapter shall be assessed a civil penalty in an
amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court.
(b) Any person who willfully violates this chapter shall be assessed a civil penalty in an
amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) plus court costs, as determined by the court.
(c) Actions for relief pursuant to this chapter shall be prosecuted exclusively in a court of
competent jurisdiction by the attorney general.
(d) Court costs recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid to the party or parties that
prosecuted the violation. Penalties recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid to the individual
to whom the genetic data at issue pertains.
(e) Any provision of a contract or agreement between a consumer and a person governed
by this chapter that has, or would have, the effect of delaying or limiting access to a legal remedy
for a violation of this chapter shall not apply to the exercise of rights or enforcement pursuant to
this chapter.
(f) Each violation of this chapter is a separate and actionable violation.
6-63-5. Conflicts of law.
(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not reduce a direct-to-consumer genetic testing
company’s duties, obligations, requirements, or standards under any applicable state and federal
LC005027 - Page 7 of 10

laws for the protection of privacy and security.
(b) In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and any other law, the
provisions of the law that afford the greatest protection for the right of privacy for consumers shall
control.
6-63-6. Exclusions.
(a) This chapter shall not apply to any of the following:
(1) Medical information governed by chapter 37.3 of title 5, (“confidentiality of medical
information act”) or to protected health information that is collected, maintained, used, or disclosed
by a covered entity or business associate governed by the privacy, security, and breach notification
rules issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, 45 CFR Parts 160 and
164 of the Code of Federal Regulations established pursuant to the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal Health
Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (Public Law 111-5);
(2) A provider of health care governed by chapter 37.3 of title 5, or a covered entity
governed by the privacy, security, and breach notification rules issued by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, established pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal Health Information Technology for Economic and
Clinical Health Act, Title XIII of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009
(Public Law 111-5), to the extent that the provider or covered entity maintains, uses, and discloses
genetic information in the same manner as medical information or protected health information, as
described in subsection (a)(1) of this section;
(3) A business associate of a covered entity governed by the privacy, security, and data
breach notification rules issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
45 CFR Parts 160 and 164 of the Code of Federal Regulations, established pursuant to the federal
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal
Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act, Title XIII of the federal
American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), to the extent that the
business associate maintains, uses, and discloses genetic information in the same manner as medical
information or protected health information, as described in subsection (a)(1) of this section;
(4) Scientific research or educational activities conducted by a public or private nonprofit
postsecondary educational institution that holds an assurance with the United States Department of
Health and Human Services pursuant to 45 CFR Part 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to the
extent that the scientific research and educational activities conducted by that institution comply
LC005027 - Page 8 of 10

with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations for the protection of human subjects in
research including, but not limited to, the Common Rule pursuant to 45 CFR Part 46 of the Code
of Federal Regulations, United States Food and Drug Administration regulations pursuant to 21
CFR Parts 50 and 56 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the federal Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Rights Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g);
(5) The provisions of the newborn screening program pursuant to § 23-13-14;
(6) Tests conducted exclusively to diagnose whether an individual has a specific disease,
to the extent that all persons involved in the conduct of the test maintain, use, and disclose genetic
information in the same manner as medical information or protected health information, as
described in subsection (a)(1) of this section; and
(7) Genetic data used or maintained by an employer, or disclosed by an employee to an
employer, to the extent that the use, maintenance, or disclosure of that data is necessary to comply
with a local, state, or federal workplace health and safety ordinance, law, or regulation.
(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect access to information made available
to the public by the consumer.
6-63-7. Severability.
The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its
application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can
be given effect without the invalid provision or application.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005027
========
LC005027 - Page 9 of 10